Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-863
Commission; clerk; salary; expenses.

The clerk of the commission shall receive such salary as the commission with the approval of the Governor determines. Such salary shall be payable in the same manner as the salaries of other state employees, and the clerk shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the performance of his or her duties as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

Laws 1993, LB 348, § 33;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1281.02;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 488;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 93.